Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-142
Loans; excessive amount; violations;
penalty.

Any officer, employee, director, or agent of any bank who knowingly violates or knowingly permits a
violation of section 8-141 is guilty of:

(1) A Class IV felony
when the violation, either separately or as part of one scheme or course of
conduct, results in the insolvency of the bank;

(2) A Class I misdemeanor when the
violation, either separately or as part of one scheme or course of conduct,
(a) results in a monetary loss to the bank of over twenty thousand dollars
or (b) exceeds the authorized limit under section 8-141 by forty thousand
dollars or more;

(3)
A Class II misdemeanor when the violation, either separately or as part of
one scheme or course of conduct, (a) results in a monetary loss to the bank
of ten thousand dollars or more, but not more than twenty thousand dollars,
or (b) exceeds the authorized limit under section 8-141 by twenty thousand
dollars or more, but less than forty thousand dollars; or

(4) A Class III misdemeanor
when the violation, either separately or as part of one scheme or course of
conduct, (a) results in no monetary loss to the bank or a monetary loss to
the bank of less than ten thousand dollars, or (b) exceeds the authorized
limit under section 8-141 by ten thousand dollars or more, but less than twenty
thousand dollars.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 33, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 312;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 33, p. 698;

Laws 1921, c. 313, § 1, p. 1002;

C.S.1922, § 8013;

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 45, p. 461;

C.S.1929, § 8-150;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 33, p. 152;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-150;

Laws 1943, c. 9, § 1(2), p. 68;

R.S.1943, § 8-151;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 42, p. 152;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 47;

Laws 2010, LB890, § 2.